2_Optimized Recursive File Scanning & Data Extraction /analyzedir/tests/tests-2/test5/hyph-gl.pat.txt
co2e3lleir
co2enll
co2enx??a
co2e3sita.
co2e3sitas.
co2e3t??ne
co2e3vo.
co2e3va.
co2e3vos.
co2e3vas.
co2i3dado
co2iei
co2imbra
co2imbr??
co2intreau.
co2??3??a
co2i3??a
co2i3??ei
co2i3p??.
co2i3p??s.
co2i3ra.
co2i3ras.
co2i3raza
co2i3ro.
co2i3ros.
co2i3ta.
co2i3tas.
co2i3tado.
co2i3to.
co2i3tos.
co2i3tel
co2i3t??o.
co2i3tus.
co2u3c
co2u3lomb
co2u3try
co2u3qui
co2u3rel
co2u3sa.
co2u3sas.
co2u3so.
co2u3sos.
co2u3selo
co2u3tad
co2u3to.
co2u3tos.
co2u3vini
co2u3z
deca2e3ment
.de2s1a2
.de2s1e2
.de2s1i2
.de2s1o2
.de2s1u2
.de2s1??2
.de2s1??2
.de2s1??2
.de2s1??2
.de2s1??2
3se.
3s2es.
3sa.
3s2as.
de3s2outr
3s2emos.
3s2edes.
3s2en.
de3s2a3crali
de3s2a3guisa
de3s2a3lini
de3s2a3ngr
de3s2a3??
de3s2a3rrollis
de3s2astr
de3s2a3zo
de3s2e3c
de3s2e3que
de3s2e3guid
de3s2e3la
de3s2ensib
de3s2e3??
de3s2ert
de3s2??rt
de3s2esper
de4s3esperanz
de3s2e3p??r
de3s2e3x
de3s2??3x
de3s2i3der
de3s2ign
de3s2??gn
de3s2i3nenc
de3s2ingr
de3s2iste
de3s2isti
de3s2o3lac
de3s2o3lad
de3s2old
de3s2o3lidari
de3s2uetud
de3s2sulf
.des2abor
.des2afia
.des2af??a
.des2af??o
.des2air
.des2emboc
.des2emb??c
.des2empe??
.des2emp????
.des2enlac
.des2enlaz
.des2enl??c
.des2enl??z
.des2envol
.des2env??l
.des2idia
.des2ora
.in2a3misib.
.in2a3mov
.in2a3ne.
.in2a3nic
.in2a3nid
.in2??3nime
.in2antes.
.in2au
.in2e3dia
.in2??3dit
.in2e3fab
.in2e3narr
.in2epc
.in2ept
.in2erc
.in2ert
.in2erm
.in2erv
.in2e3siv
.in2e3xora
.in2i3ci
.in2i3cu
.in2i3mig
.in2i3miza
.in2i3qui
.in2o3cen
.in2o3cui
.in2o3cuo
.in2o3cul
.in2??3cul
.in2o3pia.
.in2o3sili
.in2o3sit
.in2o3tr??p
.in2o3trop
.in2uit
.in2u3lase
.in2u3lina
.in2unda
.in2u3sita
.in2??3til
in2o4cular
.inte3r2??s.
.inte3r2e3sa
.inte3r2??3sa
.inte3r2e3s??
.inte3r2e3so
.inte3r2??3so
.inte3r2e3s??
.inte3r2ior
.inte3r2i3no.
.inte3r2i3nos.
.inte3r2i3na.
.inte3r2i3nas.
.inte3r2i3nid
.be2n1a2
.be2ne2
.be2n1i2
.be2n1o2
.be2n1u2
.be2n1??2
.be2n1??2
.be2n1??2
.be2n1??2
be3n2ign
be3n2i3mer??
be3n2i3n??s
be3n2i3nes
be3n2i3to??ta
.ma2l1a2
.ma2le2
.ma2l1i2
.ma2l1o2
.ma2l1u2
.ma2l1??2
.ma2l1??2
.ma2l1??2
.ma2l1??2
.mal2abar
.mal2ab??r
.mal2aco
.mal2ac??
.mal2armad
.mal2ogr
.mal2ura
.mal2axa
ma3l2a3c??a
ma3l2a3citan
ma3l2a3gue??
ma3l2aio
ma3l2aia
ma3l2andr??n
ma3l2andrin
ma3l2a3quita
ma3l2ar.
ma3l2a3res.
ma3l2a3ria.
ma3l2a3to.
ma3l2a3tos.
ma3l2a3ta.
ma3l2a3tas.
ma3l2a3ti??n
ma3l2aui
ma3l2eabl
ma3l2eabil
ma3l2eico
ma3l2eolar
ma3l2e3ta.
ma3l2e3tas.
ma3l2e3t??n
ma3l2e3teiro
ma3l2eza
ma3l2ia.
ma3l2ian
ma3l2i3cia
ma3l2i3cios
ma3l2ign
ma3l2i3kita
ma3l2inke
ma3l2??3fago
ma3l2??3nic
ma3l2o3nato
ma3l2o3nilue
ma4l3ianq
.mal1educ
.mal1encar
.mal1ensin
.mal1entend
mili2a3rio
mili2a3ria
mini2a3tur
para2u3gas
para2??3so
poli2u3r
poli2o3me
poli2arq
poli2??rq
poli2??ste
poli2andr
poli2antea
expoli2
.pos3t2a.
.pos3t2as.
.pos3t2al.
.pos3t2ais.
.pos3t2a3llo
.pos3t2e.
.pos3t2es.
.pos3t2ear.
.pos3t2e3la.
.pos3t2e3las.
.pos3t2er.
.pos3t2erg
.pos3t2e3rid
.pos3t2e3rior
.pos3t2i3go
.pos3t2i3la
.pos3t2ill??n
.pos3t2??n.
.pos3t2i3te.
.pos3t2i3zo.
.pos3t2i3zos.
.pos3t2i3za.
.pos3t2i3zas.
.pos3t2o.
.pos3t2os.
.pos3t2oiro
.pos3t2??3ni
.pos3t2u3la
.pos3t2u3lo
.pos3t2u3le
.pos3t2u3ra.
.pos3t2u3ras.
.pre2amar
.pre2ar
.pre2??2
.pre2ab??
pre2as.
pre2a3da.
pre2a3das.
pre2??2
pre2ab??
pre2i3t
pre2o3cup
pre2o3c??p
pro2e3za
pro2??3do
pro2ust
.re2al
.re2a3liz
.re2a3lidade
.re2in
.re2i3no.
.re2i3nos
.re2i3nante
.re2iter
.re2i3xa
.re2os.
.re2as.
.re2u3ma
.re2??3ma
.re2??n
.re2uni
re2u3ni??n.
re2u3ni??ns.
re2u3nir
re2u3n??rmo
re2u3n??ren
re2u3nido.
re2u3nidos.
re2u3nida.
re2u3nidas.
re2u3nind
re2u3no.
re2u3nes.
re2u3ne.
re2u3nimos.
re2u3n??mo
re2u3nen.
re2u3n??a
re2u3ni3amos.
re2u3ni3ades.
re2u3n??n.
re2u3niches.
re2u3niu.
re2u3nistes.
re2u3n??st
re2u3niron.
re2u3na.
re2u3nas.
re2u3namos.
re2u3nades.
re2u3nan.
re2u3nise
re2u3n??se
re2u3nide
re2u3n??de
re2u3n??mo
re2u3n??de
re2i3nar
re2i3nado.
re2i3nados.
re2i3nand
re2i3na.
re2i3nas.
re2i3namos.
re2i3nades.
re2i3nan.
re2i3naba.
re2i3nabas.
re2i3nabamos.
re2i3n??bamos.
re2i3nabades.
re2i3n??bades.
re2i3nei.
re2i3naches.
re2i3nou.
re2i3nastes.
re2i3naron.
re2i3ne.
re2i3nes.
re2i3nemos.
re2i3nedes.
re2i3nen.
re2i3nase.
re2i3nases.
re2i3nasemo.
re2i3nasedes.
re2i3n??se
re2i3nasen.
re2i3nade.
.su2b3l
.su2b3r
.su2b2i2
.su2b2??2
.sub2eriz
.sub2orna
sub3??ndic
sub3indic
sub3indiz
.sub4lev
.sub4lim
su3b2e3la.
su3b2e3las.
su3b2??3rico
su3b2e3rina.
su3b2e3rinas.
su3b2eroso
su3b2iote
su3b2ulado
su3b2orno.
su3b2ornos.
su3b2urbio
su3b4liminar
su3b4repci??n
su3b4reptici
tri2a3ga.
tri2a3gas.
tri2al.
tri2a3les.
tri2angul
tri2??3sico.
tri2estin
tri2unf
tri2unvir
2a3do.
2i3do.
2a3da.
2i3da.
2a3dos.
2i3dos.
2a3das.
2i3das.
2ando.
2indo.
2ar.
2ir.
2a3res.
2e3res.
2i3res.
2armos.
2ermos.
2irmos.
2ardes.
2erdes.
2irdes.
2a3ren.
2e3ren.
2i3ren.
2arme.
2erme.
2irme.
2arte.
2erte.
2irte.
2arlle.
2erlle.
2irlle.
2arnos.
2ernos.
2irnos.
2arvos.
2ervos.
2irvos.
2arlles.
2erlles.
2irlles.
2a3dor.
2e3dor.
2i3dor.
2a3dora.
2e3dora.
2i3dora.
2a3dores.
2e3dores.
2i3dores.
2a3doiro.
2e3doiro.
2i3doiro.
2a3doiros.
2e3doiros.
2i3doiros.
2a3doira.
2e3doira.
2i3doira.
2a3doiras.
2e3doiras.
2i3doiras.
2a3deiro.
2e3deiro.
2i3deiro.
2a3deiros.
2e3deiros.
2i3deiros.
2a3deira.
2e3deira.
2i3deira.
2a3deiras.
2e3deiras.
2i3deiras.
2a3lo.
2e3lo.
2i3lo.
2a3los.
2e3los.
2i3los.
2a3la.
2e3la.
2i3la.
2a3las.
2e3las.
2i3las.
2a3rei.
2e3rei.
2i3rei.
2a3r??s.
2e3r??s.
2i3r??s.
2a3r??.
2e3r??.
2i3r??.
2a3remos.
2e3remos.
2i3remos.
2a3redes.
2e3redes.
2i3redes.
2a3r??n.
2e3r??n.
2i3r??n.
2a3r??a.
2e3r??a.
2i3r??a.
2a3r??as.
2e3r??as.
2i3r??as.
2a3ri1amos.
2e3ri1amos.
2i3ri1amos.
2a3r??amos.
2e3r??amos.
2i3r??amos.
2a3ri1ades.
2e3ri1ades.
2i3ri1ades.
2a3r??ades.
2e3r??ades.
2i3r??ades.
2a3r??an.
2e3r??an.
2i3r??an.
2a3de.
2e3de.
2i3de.
2??3deo.
2??3deo.
2??3deo.
2??3dea.
2??3dea.
2??3dea.
2??3deos.
2??3deos.
2??3deos.
2??3deas.
2??3deas.
2??3deas.
2as.
2a3mos.
2a3des.
2an.
2a3ba.
2a3bas.
2a3bamos.
2??3bamos.
2a3bades.
2??3bades.
2a3ban.
2a3ches.
2astes.
2a3ron.
2es.
2e3mos.
2e3des.
2en.
2a3se.
2a3ses.
2??3semos.
2??3sedes.
2a3sen.
o3ar.
o3ado.
o3ada.
o3ados.
o3adas.
o3ando.
o3ares.
o3armos.
o3ardes.
o3aren.
o3arme.
o3arte.
o3arlle.
o3arnos.
o3arvos.
o3arlles.
o3alo.
o3alos.
o3ala.
o3alas.
o3ade.
o3??deo.
o3??dea.
o3??deos.
o3??deas.
o3as.
o3amos.
o3ades.
o3an.
o3aba.
o3abas.
o3abamos.
o3??bamos.
o3abades.
o3??bades.
o3aban.
o3aches.
o3astes.
o3aron.
o3es.
o3emos.
o3edes.
o3en.
o3ase.
o3ases.
o3??semos.
o3??sedes.
o3asen.
e3ar.
e3ado.
e3ada.
e3ados.
e3adas.
e3ando.
e3ares.
e3armos.
e3ardes.
e3aren.
e3arme.
e3arte.
e3arlle.
e3arnos.
e3arvos.
e3arlles.
e3alo.
e3alos.
e3ala.
e3alas.
e3ade.
e3??deo.
e3??dea.
e3??deos.
e3??deas.
e3as.
e3amos.
e3ades.
e3an.
e3aba.
e3abas.
e3abamos.
e3??bamos.
e3abades.
e3??bades.
e3aban.
e3aches.
e3astes.
e3aron.
e3es.
e3emos.
e3edes.
e3en.
e3ase.
e3ases.
e3??semos.
e3??sedes.
e3asen.
2i3mos.
2i3des.
2??a.
2??as.
2??amos.
2??ades.
2??an.
2??n.
2i3ches.
2iu.
2istes.
2i3ron.
2i3se.
2i3ses.
2??3semos.
2??3sedes.
2i3sen.
??3do
??3da
??3dos
??3das
.su3bir.
.su3bindo.
.su3bido.
.su3bida.
.su3bidos.
.su3bidas.
.su3bires.
.su3birmos.
.su3birdes.
.su3biren.
.su3bo.
.su3bes.
.su3be.
.su3bimos.
.su3bides.
.su3ben.
.su3b??a.
.su3b??as.
.su3b2i3amos.
.su3b??amos.
.su3b2i3ades.
.su3b??ades.
.su3b??an.
.su3b??n.
.su3biches.
.su3biu.
.su3bistes.
.su3biron.
.su3birei.
.su3bir??s.
.su3bir??.
.su3biremos.
.su3biredes.
.su3bir??n.
.su3bir??a.
.su3bir??as.
.su3biriamos.
.su3bir??amos.
.su3biriades.
.su3bir??ades.
.su3bir??an.
.su3ba.
.su3bas.
.su3bamos.
.su3bades.
.su3ban.
.su3bise.
.su3bises.
.su3b??semos.
.su3b??sedes.
.su3bisen.
.su3bide.
.su3b??deo.
.su3b??deos.
.su3b??dea.
.su3b??deas.
.su3bador.
.su3badora.
.su3badores.
.su3badoras.
.supe3rar.
.supe3rando.
.supe3rado.
.supe3rada.
.supe3rados.
.supe3radas.
.supe3rares.
.supe3rarmos.
.supe3rardes.
.supe3raren.
.supe3ra.
.supe3ras.
.supe3ramos.
.supe3rades.
.supe3ran.
.supe3raba.
.supe3rabas.
.supe3rabamos.
.supe3r??bamos.
.supe3rabades.
.supe3r??bades.
.supe3raban.
.supe3rei.
.supe3raches.
.supe3rou.
.supe3rastes.
.supe3raron.
.supe3rarei.
.supe3rar??s.
.supe3rar??.
.supe3reremos.
.supe3reredes.
.supe3rar??n.
.supe3rar??a.
.supe3rar??as.
.supe3rariamos.
.supe3rar??amos.
.supe3rariades.
.supe3rar??ades.
.supe3rar??an.
.supe3re.
.supe3res.
.supe3remos.
.supe3redes.
.supe3ren.
.supe3rase.
.supe3rases.
.supe3r??semos.
.supe3r??sedes.
.supe3rasen.
.supe3rade.
.supe3r??deo.
.supe3r??deos.
.supe3r??dea.
.supe3r??deas.
.supe3rador.
.supe3radora.
.supe3radores.
.supe3radoras.
.supe3raci??n.
supe3r2ior
supe3r2a3ble
supe3r2a3bilidade
a3er.
a3endo.
a3eres.
a3ermos.
a3erdes.
a3eren.
a3erme.
a3erte.
a3erlle.
a3ernos.
a3ervos.
a3erlles.
a3elo.
a3elos.
a3ela.
a3elas.
a3ede.
a3??deo.
a3??dea.
a3??deos.
a3??deas.
a3emos.
a3edes.
a3eron.
a3ese.
a3eses.
a3esemos.
a3??semos.
a3esedes.
a3??sedes.
a3esen.
